Arkansas, session 2025, HB1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-64-406(b), concerning the allocation of
enrollment positions at the University of Arkansas College of Medicine for
the freshman medical class among congressional districts, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The board shall allocate the first seventy percent (70%) of
the first one hundred fifty (150) enrollment positions for the freshman
medical class among Arkansas congressional districts, using the population of
each congressional district as determined by the last federal decennial
census to determine that district's proportion of the freshman positions so
allocated and shall assign those apportioned enrollment positions for each
district to those applicants who are legal residents in that particular
congressional district twenty-five (25) positions to each congressional
district.
*CRH230*
03-20-2025 09:50:41 CRH230

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 HB1833
(B) The board shall give additional consideration to rural
applicants from medically underserved areas in an effort to address health
disparities If there are not twenty-five (25) applicants from a congressional
district who meet published admissions standards and accept an offer of
acceptance, the remaining positions for that congressional district first
shall be filled by qualified applicants who are Arkansas residents and then
by applicants that are most likely to complete the program and reside in
Arkansas.
(2)(A) The next fifteen percent (15%) of the first one hundred
fifty (150) freshman enrollment positions shall be allocated to the state at
large and assigned to applicants who are legal residents of any place within
Arkansas An additional twenty-five (25) positions shall be allocated to
applicants who are Arkansas residents.
(B) However, in allocating the fifteen percent (15%) to
the state at large, the board may allocate not to exceed one-third (⅓) of the
fifteen percent (15%) of the first one hundred fifty (150) freshman
enrollment positions to applicants who do not actually reside in the state
but who were born and reared and attended public schools in Arkansas and who
in addition thereto shall meet two (2) or more of the following criteria:
(i) Applicant is a registered voter in Arkansas;
(ii) Applicant holds a current valid Arkansas
driver's license;
(iii) Applicant or parents of applicant are Arkansas
taxpayers;
(iv) Parent of applicant resides in or is employed
in Arkansas; and
(v) Applicant meets other related criteria as may be
prescribed by the board If there are not twenty-five (25) applicants who are
Arkansas residents who meet published admissions standards and accept an
offer of acceptance, then the remaining positions first shall be filled by
qualified applicants who have ties to Arkansas and then by applicants who are
most likely to complete the program and reside in Arkansas.
(3) The remaining fifteen percent (15%) of the first one hundred
fifty (150) freshman enrollment positions may be assigned either to legal
residents or to nonresidents, however, any qualified legal resident shall
have a preference in securing an assignment to a position when compared to a
03-20-2025 09:50:41 CRH230

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 HB1833
nonresident, and the total number of nonresidents assigned positions shall
not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the first one hundred fifty (150)
freshman enrollment positions assigned for any school year Positions in
excess of the positions provided under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this
section may be filled by applicants at large.
(4) The board may provide for an alteration in the percentages
set forth in this subsection only if the adherence to these percentages would
endanger the accredited rating of the University of Arkansas College of
Medicine as determined by the standards of the Association of American
Medical Colleges.

/s/M. Shepherd
























03-20-2025 09:50:41 CRH230